Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXI Debtor-Creditor Relations
CHAPTER 376 Statutory Liens
376.230.
Lien dissolved unless statement timely filed with county clerk — Form and content of statement — Duties and fees of clerk.

The lien provided for in KRS

376.210

shall be dissolved unless the person who furnishes the labor, materials, or supplies shall, whichever is later, within sixty (60) days after the last day of the month in which any labor, materials, or supplies were furnished, or by the date of substantial completion, file in the county clerk’s office of each county in which labor, materials, or supplies were furnished, except as hereinafter provided, a statement in writing verified by affidavit of the claimant or his or her authorized agent or attorney, setting forth the amount due for which the lien is claimed, the date on which labor, materials, or supplies were last furnished and the name of the canal, railroad, bridge, public highway, or other public improvement upon which it is claimed.

In all cases where a lien is claimed for labor, materials, or supplies furnished for the improvement of any bridge, public highway, or other public property owned by the state or by any county, charter county, urban-county, consolidated local government, or city, the statement of lien shall be filed only in the county clerk’s office of the county in which the seat of government of the owner of the property is located.

The county clerk, upon the filing of the statement, shall make an abstract and entry thereof as now provided by law in case of mechanics’ liens in the same book used for that purpose, and shall make proper index thereof. The clerk shall be paid by the party filing the claim, and for attesting any copy of the lien statement. If he or she is required to make the copy, he or she may make an additional charge as provided by law. The clerk’s fees shall be determined pursuant to KRS

64.012

. All of these charges may be recovered by the lien claimant as costs from the party and out of the fund against which the claim is filed.

History.

2494: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 296, § 1; 1978, ch. 84, § 14, effective June 17, 1978; 2005, ch. 104, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 136, § 7, effective June 26, 2007.

376.240.
Perfecting a lien on funds due contractor from public authority.

Upon the filing of the statement of lien provided for in subsection (2) of KRS

376.230

in the county clerk’s office and the delivery of an attested copy thereof to the public authority making the contract for the improvement of any bridge, public highway or other public property owned by the state or any county or city, and the filing with the public authority of a signed copy of a letter addressed to the contractor or subcontractor at his address given in the contract, with a post office receipt showing that an attested copy of the lien statement has been sent by the lien claimant to the contractor or subcontractor by certified mail, return receipt requested or by registered mail, the claimant shall have a lien superior to any lien subsequently perfected on any unpaid balance due the contractor under the contract of improvement.

History.

2494: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 315, § 80.

376.250.
Withholding by public authority of funds due contractor and their payment to lien claimant — Protest by contractor — Suit by lien claimant.

When an attested copy of the lien statement and proof of the delivery of an attested copy as provided in KRS

376.240

is delivered to any public authority which has contracted for the construction or improvement of any bridge, public highway, or other public property owned by the state, a subdivision or agency thereof, or by any city, county, urban-county, or charter county government, the public authority shall endorse on the attested copy the date of its receipt, file the copy and deduct and withhold the amount thereof, plus pursuant to KRS

64.012

to cover the fee of the county clerk for filing the statement and attesting a copy, from any amount then due the contractor, and if a sufficient amount is not then due the contractor from the next payments which become due.

Unless the contractor, within thirty (30) days from the date of the delivery of the attested copy, files with the public authority a written protest putting in issue the correctness of the amount due the lien claimant or the liability of the fund for payment thereof, the amount withheld shall be paid by the public authority to the lien claimant and charged to the account of the contractor, which payment shall operate as a pro tanto release of the public authority from any claim of the contractor under the contract for the amount so paid. The filing in the county clerk’s office of the statement of lien provided for in KRS 376.230(2) shall be constructive notice to the contractor of the filing of the claim.

If the contractor files a written protest as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the public authority with whom the protest is filed shall endorse thereon the date of its receipt. The public authority shall promptly send written notice of the protest to the lien claimant by certified mail, return receipt requested and shall not pay over to the lien claimant any of the money withheld from the contractor until authorized to do so by the contractor or until directed to do so by an order or judgment of court.

If suit is not instituted by the lien claimant for the enforcement of the lien and summons in the suit is not served on the public authority or its chairman within thirty (30) days after the written notice of the protest is mailed to the claimant, then the lien shall automatically be released and the funds withheld pursuant to the filing of the lien statement shall be released and promptly paid to the contractor. If suit is filed and summons served within the time provided, the payment of the funds shall be withheld until ordered to be released or paid over by an order or judgment of the court, and then paid as directed by the order or judgment.

All suits for the enforcement of these liens on public funds shall be instituted in the Circuit Court of the county in which is located the property on which the improvement is made, except where the property is owned by a public university. Where the property is owned by a public university, the suit shall be instituted in the Circuit Court of the county in which is located the main campus of the public university. This court shall have exclusive jurisdiction for the enforcement of liens asserted against the public funds due the contractors, subject to the same rights of appeal as in other civil cases.

History.

2494, 2494-1; 1998, ch. 397, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 250, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2006, ch. 255, § 29, effective January 1, 2007.

376.260.
Action to enforce lien — Notice — Limitation — Proof of use of materials.

Any lien acquired under KRS

376.210

shall be enforced by proper proceedings in equity, to which other lien-holders shall be made parties. If a court action is filed to enforce a lien acquired under KRS

376.210

and the owner of the property is the state, a subdivision or agency thereof, or any city, county, urban-county, or charter county government, that owner shall be given notice of the court action to enforce the lien, but that owner shall not be required to respond to or participate in the court action. The proceedings shall be begun within six (6) months from the filing of the claim in the county clerk’s office, except as provided in subsection (4) of KRS

376.250

.

If, in any suit brought for the enforcement of a lien, it is shown by evidence that the items embraced in the account were sold and delivered for use on a particular project or public work, that evidence shall make out a prima facie case that those items were used in the performance of the contract.

History.

2495, 2495-3; 1998, ch. 397, § 2, effective July 15, 1998.

376.265.
Lien on real property for service to retail business by municipal utility — Priority — Statement of lien — Action to enforce — Release of lien by execution of bond.

As used in this section, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Charges” means all rates, charges, and other amounts payable for services rendered by a municipal utility, including and without limitation penalties, interest, reasonable attorney’s fees, and other costs of enforcing the lien;

“Municipal utility” means any public agency that owns or operates a system or facilities for the provision of gas, electric, sewer, water, or telecommunications service to retail customers;

“Public agency” has the same meaning as specified in KRS

65.230

;

“Retail business ratepayer” means any nonresidential ratepayer of a municipal utility that is in arrears on the utility bill in an amount in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000); and

“Service” means gas, electric, sewer, or water service provided by the municipal utility.

Any municipal utility shall have a lien on the real property of a retail business ratepayer served by the municipal utility. The lien shall be for the collection of rates and charges for retail utility service provided to the retail business ratepayer. In no instance shall this lien attach to the real property of an owner who has leased the property to a retail business ratepayer unless the property owner is responsible for paying the utility charges under the lease agreement.

The lien shall arise and attach as services are provided to the retail business ratepayer and shall remain in place until the rates and charges for the services are paid in full. The lien is deemed a statutory lien within the meaning of 11

U.S.C. sec. 101(53)

.

The rights to a lien under this section:

Are in addition to any other rights or remedies a municipal utility may have under the law or pursuant to a contract; and

Are not intended to impair or alter any of the municipal utility’s other rights or remedies, including the ability to require an additional deposit or to shut off and discontinue service.

The lien may take priority over a mortgage, a contract lien, or a bona fide conveyance for value if:

The municipal utility files notice which is duly recorded or lodged for record according to law;

The utility claiming the prior lien files a statement of lien in the office of the county clerk of the county where the service has been furnished before the recording of the mortgage, the contract lien, or the conveyance; and

The statement of lien is in the form prescribed in subsections (6) and (7) of this section.

The statement of lien shall be subscribed and sworn to by an authorized representative of the municipal utility and shall identify the following:

The municipal utility claiming the lien, including an address and a contact person;

The property, by legal description, against which the lien is claimed;

The nature of the service provided;

The contract, if any, pursuant to which the services were provided; and

The amounts, if any, due for services provided.

The statement of lien shall be recorded in the office of the county clerk of the county where the service is furnished or the property or some portion of the property serviced by the municipal utility is situated. The utility shall send a copy of the statement of lien by regular mail, postage prepaid, to the owner of the property at the owner’s last known address or to the address associated with the tax bill for the property. The copy of the statement of lien shall be sent within ten (10) business days of its filing in the office of the county clerk.

At any time, a municipal utility may supplement the statement of lien by recording the supplement in the same manner as the original statement of lien. Any supplement to the statement of lien shall relate back to the date of the original recording of the statement of lien.

The county clerk shall endorse each statement of lien on the date of its filing and the clerk shall make an abstract of the statement, endorse the abstract, and place it in a book to be kept by the clerk for that purpose. The book shall contain the following:

The endorsed and indexed abstracts;

The date of filing the statement;

The name of the municipal utility;

The name of the person against whose property the lien is filed; and

A description of the property charged with the lien.

The clerk shall receive a fee pursuant to KRS

64.012

from the person filing the statement as full compensation, which shall be taxed and collected as other costs.

An action to enforce the lien under this section shall be by equitable proceedings and conducted as other proceedings in equity in similar cases. The petition shall allege the facts necessary to secure a lien, describe the property charged, and the plaintiff’s interest in enforcing the lien. Lienholders may unite in the action to enforce the lien as plaintiffs, and those who are not plaintiffs shall be made defendants. The debtor or the debtor’s personal representative, heirs, devisees, and all other persons having liens on or interests in the property sought to be subjected shall be made defendants.

The clerk of the court in which the petition is filed shall issue the proper process against the defendants. After the expiration of ten (10) days from the filing of the petition, the clerk of the court in which the petition was filed shall:

Draw up an order referring the action to the master commissioner of the court and file it with the petition;

Deliver the pleadings and papers of the action to the commissioner; and

Make a memorandum of the action in the minute book.

If, for any cause, it should be improper to refer the case to the master commissioner, the master commissioner is directed to select some suitable person to act as a new commissioner for the case and refer the case to him or her. However, before proceeding to act on the case, the new commissioner shall take an oath before the clerk and execute bond with sufficient surety. The bond shall be preserved by the clerk and reported to the court.

The owner or claimant of property against which a lien has been asserted may file a bond for double the amount of the lien claimed with the county clerk in the county where the lien was filed. Bond may be asserted at any time before a judgment is rendered enforcing the lien, and the bond shall have good sureties approved by the clerk and be conditioned upon the obligors satisfying any judgment that may be rendered in favor of the person asserting the lien. The bond shall be preserved by the clerk, and upon its execution, the lien upon the property shall be discharged. The person asserting the lien may make the obligors in the bond parties to any action to enforce its claim. Any judgment recovered may be against all or any of the obligors on the bond.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 169, § 1, effective July 15, 2010.

376.268.
Definitions for KRS 376.270 and 376.275.

As used in KRS

376.270

and

376.275

:

“Contents” means personal items located in a motor vehicle, but does not include manufacturer-installed or after-market accessories permanently affixed to the motor vehicle;

“Motor vehicle” includes vessels used or designed for navigation of or operation on waterways, rivers, lakes, and streams, as well as those used or designed for operation on the public highways; and

“Reasonable charges” means those charges which are usual and customary, not discriminatory, and which are typical charges for services provided by similar towing or storage companies with similar equipment and facilities operating in the region or comparable-size city or county from which the vehicle was towed or stored.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 241, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 2015 ch. 8, § 1, effective June 24, 2015.

376.270.
Lien on motor vehicle for repairs, storage or accessories — Filing of statement with county clerk.

Any person engaged in the business of selling, repairing or furnishing accessories or supplies for motor vehicles shall have a lien on the motor vehicle for the reasonable or agreed charges for repairs, work done or accessories or supplies furnished for the vehicle, and for storing or keeping the vehicle, and may detain any motor vehicle in his possession on which work has been done by him until the reasonable or agreed charge therefor has been paid. The lien shall not be lost by the removal of the motor vehicle from the garage or premises of the person performing labor, repairing or furnishing accessories or supplies therefor, if the lien shall be asserted within six (6) months by filing in the office of the county clerk a statement showing the amount and cost of materials furnished or labor performed on the vehicle. The statement shall be filed in the same manner as provided in the case of a mechanic’s and materialman’s lien, after the removal of the vehicle, unless the owner of the vehicle consents to an additional extension of time, in which event the lien shall extend for the length of time the parties agree upon. The agreement shall be reduced to writing and signed by the parties thereto.

History.

2739h-1.

376.272.
Marina may enforce lien on boat asserted pursuant to KRS 376.270 by civil action.

Any marina asserting a possessory lien pursuant to KRS

376.270

may enforce the lien by filing a civil action in the county in which the boat is located.

Prior to filing an action pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the marina shall send, by certified mail, return receipt requested, notice of intent to enforce the lien to:

All known owners at their last known address; and

All secured parties discernible through reasonable effort. For the purposes of this paragraph, “reasonable effort” includes notice to any secured party that has:

Properly perfected its security interest in the boat by having its lien indicated on a certificate of title for the boat;

Properly perfected its security interest through an unexpired sufficient financing statement filed in the jurisdiction of the boat owner’s residence, as that jurisdiction appears on the certificate of title, or equivalent document, for the boat; or

Become a mortgagee of a federally documented vessel by recording a ship mortgage on the vessel pursuant to Chapter 313 of Title 46 of the United States Code.

In addition to the notice required in this subsection, the marina shall advertise the notice of intent to enforce the lien at least once per week for two (2) consecutive weeks pursuant to KRS Chapter 424.

Upon the marina properly sending notice of its intent to enforce its lien in accordance with subsection (2) of this section, a boat’s owner may not remove the boat from the marina without a court order.

The notice of intent to enforce the lien required by subsection (2) of this section shall include:

The name of the owner of the boat as indicated on the certificate of title, certificate of registration, or certificate of documentation;

The owner’s last known address;

The make, model, length, and hull identification number of the boat if visually discernable; and

A description of any attached outboard motor, including make, horsepower, and serial number if visually discernable.

Any secured party to whom notice was sent pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall be named as a party in any civil action filed to enforce a marina’s lien under KRS

376.270

and called upon to enter therein and set forth its claim or interest in the boat that is subject to the action, and the secured party shall be served with summons at its address as indicated on the certificate of title, financing statement, or ship mortgage through which its security interest was perfected.

Upon judgment being entered in favor of a marina pursuant to this section, and subject to any restrictions of the United States Code, or any regulations issued pursuant thereto, regarding federally documented vessels, the court shall order the boat, or any part of the furniture and tackle as may be sufficient, to be sold for the satisfaction of the judgment. The marina shall conduct the sale in conformity with reasonable commercial practices among dealers in the type of boat being sold and in accordance with the court order. The sale shall be advertised in conformity with reasonable commercial practices among dealers for the type of boat being sold and, additionally, shall be advertised at least ten (10) days prior to the sale pursuant to KRS Chapter 424.

The court shall authorize and direct the county clerk to issue a title to the purchaser of the boat at a sale authorized by and conducted in conformance with this section, and the purchaser shall take title to the boat free of any liens or encumbrances. Any liens or encumbrances attached to the boat shall attach to the proceeds of the sale in the same order of priority that the liens and encumbrances attach to the boat pursuant to applicable law.

HISTORY:

2016 ch. 120, § 2, effective July 15, 2016.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/2016). In 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 120, sec. 2, a portion of subsection (2) of this statute was divided into paragraphs (a), (b), and (c). In codification, the paragraph designation “(c)” has been removed, because the sentence following that designation is not properly part of the list enumerated by paragraphs (a) and (b). The wording of the statute has not been changed. The Reviser of Statutes has made this correction under the authority of KRS 7.136(1).

376.275.
Lien on motor vehicles and contents for reasonable and applicable charges under KRS 281.920 to 281.936 — Forfeiture and sale of contents — Exempted contents — Limitation of storage or towing company’s liability.

Any person engaged in the business of storing or towing motor vehicles, who has complied with the notification requirements of KRS

281.928

, shall have a lien on the motor vehicle and its contents, except as set forth in subsection (2) of this section, for the applicable and reasonable charges assessed in accordance with KRS

281.926

and

281.932

, as long as it remains in his or her possession.

If, after a period of forty-five (45) days, the applicable and reasonable charges assessed in accordance with KRS

281.926

and

281.932

have not been paid, the motor vehicle and its contents, except as set forth in subsection (2) of this section, may be sold to pay the charges after the owner and any lienholder have been notified by certified mail at the addresses specified in KRS

281.928

(1), ten (10) days prior to the time and place of the sale. If the proceeds of the sale of any vehicle pursuant to this section are insufficient to satisfy accrued charges, the sale and collection of proceeds shall not constitute a waiver or release of responsibility for payment of unpaid charges by the owner or responsible casualty insurer of the vehicle. A lien on a vehicle under this subsection shall be subject to prior recorded liens, unless released by any existing lienholder pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection.

A lienholder having a prior recorded lien listed on the title issued by the Commonwealth of Kentucky shall be notified by certified mail within the first ten (10) days of impoundment in accordance with KRS 281.928. Such notification, in addition to the requirements of KRS 281.928 shall include the make, model, license number, vehicle identification number, owner’s name and last known address, and tentative date of sale for the vehicle, and state that the towing company or storage facility seeks to obtain a new title free and clear of any liens, excluding tax liens. If the above-referenced certified letter is not sent within the ten (10) days by the towing and storage company, then only ten (10) days of storage may be charged. The lienholder has the right to take possession of the motor vehicle after showing proof of lien still enforced, and paying the reasonable or agreed towing and storage charges on the motor vehicle. If a lienholder does not exercise the right to take possession of the motor vehicle under this paragraph within forty-five (45) days of notification, and all lienholders agree in writing, the tow company or storage facility may obtain a new title under KRS

186A.145

free and clear of any liens, excluding tax liens. Nothing in this section shall allow the transfer of a vehicle subject to a lien, except as provided in KRS

186A.190

.

If there are no lienholders required to be notified under KRS

281.920

to

281.936

and

359.230

and this section, and the owner does not exercise the right to take possession of the motor vehicle under this section within forty-five (45) days of notification required under KRS 281.928, the towing company or storage facility may obtain a new title under KRS

186A.145

free and clear of any liens, excluding tax liens.

Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to the following contents of a motor vehicle, which shall be released to the vehicle owner or the owner’s designated agent upon request, if the request is made within forty-five (45) days of the date the vehicle was towed:

Prescription medication in its proper container;

Personal medical supplies and equipment or records;

Educational materials, including but not limited to calculators, books, papers, and school supplies;

Documents, files, electronic devices, or equipment which may be able to store personal information or information relating to a person’s employment or business;

Firearms and ammunition. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (3) of this section, firearms and ammunition which are not claimed by the owner of the vehicle within forty-five (45) days of the date the vehicle was towed shall be transferred to the Department of Kentucky State Police for disposition as provided by KRS

16.220

;

Cargo in the possession of persons engaged in transportation in interstate commerce as registered under KRS

186.020

;

Cargo in the possession of an integrated intermodal small package carrier as defined by KRS 281.605(12);

Child restraint systems or child booster seats; and

Checks, checkbooks, debit or credit cards, money orders, stocks, or bonds.

Except as provided in subsection (2)(e) of this section, any contents exempted under subsection (2)(c), (d), (f), and (g) of this section that are not claimed by the owner of the vehicle within forty-five (45) days of the date the vehicle was towed may be sold or otherwise legally disposed of by the storage or towing company. Any contents exempted under subsection (2)(a), (b), (h), and (i) of this section that are not claimed by the owner of the vehicle within forty-five (45) days of the date the vehicle was towed shall not be sold, but shall be otherwise legally disposed of by the storage or towing company.

The storage or towing company shall not be responsible for contents in a vehicle’s trunk or other locked compartment to which the storage or towing company is without access, unless the towing company intentionally opens the area without the owner’s consent.

This section shall not apply when a local government causes a vehicle to be towed pursuant to KRS

82.605

to

82.640

or if state government causes a vehicle to be towed.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 20; 1986, ch. 238, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 9, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 2015 ch. 8, § 2, effective June 24, 2015; 2021 ch. 74, § 12, effective June 29, 2021.

376.280.
Sale of boat or motor vehicle for charges — Advertisement of sale — Definition of “boat.”

Any boat or motor vehicle remaining in the possession of a person who has made repairs, performed labor or furnished accessories or supplies therefor and to whom the charges for such repairs, labor, accessories or supplies has been owing for a period of more than thirty (30) days, may be sold to pay such deferred purchase money or charges. The proposed sale shall be advertised pursuant to KRS Chapter 424, and notice thereof shall be sent by certified mail, return receipt requested or by registered mail to the owner of the boat or motor vehicle and to any other person known to have any interest therein, addressed to such persons at their last known addresses, at least ten (10) days before the sale is held.

The term “boat,” as used in subsection (1) of this section, means any watercraft not enumerated in subsection (1) of KRS

376.360

and sloops having an overall length of forty (40) feet or less.

History.

2739h-2: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 40; 1966, ch. 239, § 214; 1974, ch. 315, § 81.

376.281.
Lien on aircraft for storage, repairs or accessories.

As used in KRS

376.270

and

376.280

, “motor vehicle” shall include vehicles used or designed for navigation of or flight in the air, as well as those used or designed for operation on the public highways.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 209.

376.290.
Lien on watches and jewelry for repairs — Sale for charges.

Any person performing work upon any watch, clock or jewelry for a price shall have a lien upon that article for the amount due for the work. The lien shall include the value or agreed price of all materials furnished in connection with the work, whether added to the article or not. The lien may be enforced by legal action or as hereafter provided.

If the account remains unpaid six (6) months after completing the work, the person holding the lien may, upon thirty (30) days’ notice in writing to the owner specifying the amount due and informing the owner that the payment of the amount due within thirty (30) days will entitle him to redeem the property, sell the article at public or bona fide private sale to satisfy the account. The notice may be served by mail directed to the owner’s last known address, or, if the owner or his address is unknown, it may be published pursuant to KRS Chapter 424.

The proceeds of the sale, after paying the expenses thereof, shall be applied in liquidation of the indebtedness secured by the lien, and the balance, if any, shall be held for a period of twelve (12) months for the owner, and if it is not called for in that time it shall be paid into the district school fund.

History.

2504a-1: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 239, § 215.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Nowka and Taylor, Kentucky Employees’ Wage Liens: A Sneak Attack on Creditors, but Beware of the Bankruptcy Trustee, 84 Ky. L.J. 317 (1995-96).

376.300.
Lien of dry cleaner, launderer, or tailor on article for work done — Sale for charges — Notification and criteria for sale.

Any person who cleans, presses, glazes, launders, alters, or repairs any wearing apparel or household goods shall have a lien on the article remaining in his possession to secure the reasonable or agreed charge for the service. If the charge is not paid within ninety (90) days, the article may be sold to pay the charges and costs of notice, after notice has been given the customer of the time and place of sale.

The notice of time and place of sale, when given, shall be by registered letter mailed to the last known address of the customer. The person sending the letter may do so anytime after an article has been held for at least sixty (60) days, and the notice by registered letter shall specify that the article may be sold unless it is redeemed within thirty (30) days from the date of the letter.

Any article which is left with any person who cleans, presses, glazes, launders, alters, or repairs any wearing apparel or other household goods and which is not redeemed by the customer within one hundred eighty (180) days shall be considered abandoned. It may, without any liability or responsibility for the article on the part of the person holding it and without notification to the customer, be sold or otherwise disposed of.

The foregoing provisions shall not apply to property that is to be placed in storage with the person rendering any service mentioned above, but such property shall be subject to the provisions of KRS

376.310

.

History.

2504b-2: amend. Acts 1992, ch. 67, § 1, effective July 14, 1992.

376.310.
Lien for storage and services on article prior to storage — Sale for charges.

Any person who keeps any wearing apparel or household goods in storage, or who has performed any of the services mentioned in KRS

376.300

on such an article and then keeps it in storage, shall have a lien on the article as long as it remains in his possession. If the reasonable or agreed charges have not been paid for a period of twelve (12) months the article may be sold to pay the charges, after the owner has been notified of the time and place of sale.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any person operating as a warehouseman under KRS Chapter 359.

History.

2504b-3.

376.320.
Notice of sale of article for charges — Distribution of proceeds.

The mailing of a registered letter with the return address marked thereon, addressed to the owner at the address given at the time of delivery of the article to the person rendering any service set out in KRS

376.300

or

376.310

, stating the time and place of sale, shall constitute notice of the sale. The notice shall be mailed at least fifteen (15) days before the date of sale. The cost of mailing the letter shall be added to the charges.

The person to whom the charges are payable shall, from the proceeds of sale, deduct the charges due plus the cost of notifying the owner, and hold the balance, if any, subject to the order of the owner. He shall immediately thereafter mail to the owner at his address, if known, notification of the sale and notice of the balance due him, and at any time within twelve (12) months, upon demand pay to the owner the balance. If the balance is unclaimed after twelve (12) months it shall be paid into the State Treasury, and held for a period of two (2) years subject to the order of the owner or his personal representative upon satisfactory proof of rightful ownership.

History.

2504b-4, 2504b-5.

376.330.
Posting of notices necessary to claim liens.

No person shall obtain a lien under KRS

376.300

or

376.310

unless at all times he keeps posted in prominent places in his receiving office two (2) notices which shall read as follows: “All articles cleaned, pressed, glazed, laundered, washed, altered or repaired and not called for in 90 days will be sold to pay charges. All articles stored 12 months on which charges have not been paid will be sold to pay charges.”

History.

2504b-6.

376.340.
Lien of keeper of hotel, inn, boarding house or house of private entertainment on personal property of guest for charges.

Any keeper of a hotel, inn, boarding house or house of private entertainment shall have a lien on all baggage and other personal property owned and brought in by the person receiving board, nursing, care or attention from the landlord, for the contract price of the service received, or, if no contract price is set, for a reasonable price.

History.

2179a-1.

376.350.
Enforcement of lien on property of guest.

Any person in whose favor a lien created by KRS

376.340

exists may, before the District Court of the county where the debt was created, by himself, agent or attorney, make affidavit of the amount due him and in arrear for services to the person receiving them and describing, as nearly as possible, the baggage or other personal property owned and brought in by the guest. The court shall then issue a warrant directed to the sheriff or any constable or town marshal of the county, authorizing him to levy upon and seize the property described in the affidavit for the amount due, with interest and costs. If the property has been removed with the consent of the landlord, the lien shall not continue longer than ten (10) days from and after the removal.

History.

2179a-3, 2179a-4: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 288, effective January 2, 1978.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Proceedings upon distress warrants, KRS

426.620

to

426.715

.

376.360.
Liens on steamboats and other vessels for work and supplies.

Any officer or employee, except the captain, employed on board a steamboat, brig, schooner, sloop or model barge shall have a lien on the vessel or on the engine, tackle, furnishing and apparel for their wages, whether contracted for or earned in or out of this state, with priority therefor over any other debt due from the owner of the vessel, and over all other liens thereon.

Mechanics, tradesmen and other persons shall have a like lien to that given by subsection (1) of this section for work, supplies, materials, stores and provisions done or furnished on the building, repairing, fitting, furnishing or equipping the vessel in this state, with priority therefor over any other debt of the owner, except that to the officers and employees, and over all other liens thereafter created. Any mechanic, tradesman or other person who does work or furnishes material or supplies out of this state shall have a like lien therefor, which shall have precedence next after that given when done or furnished in this state; but if done or furnished out of this state, subsequent to that done or furnished in this state, the liens shall be joint and equal.

History.

2480.

376.370.
Liability for damage done by vessel.

A steamboat or other vessel named in KRS

376.360

and its owner shall be liable to the party injured for any damage done by her through the willful or negligent conduct of her officers or crew while acting for her as such.

History.

2481.

376.380.
Enforcement of lien and liability against vessel.

The lien given in KRS

376.360

, and the liability provided for in KRS

376.370

, may be enforced by attachment from the court having jurisdiction.

History.

2482.

376.390.
Joinder of lienholders as plaintiffs — When lien may be enforced against purchaser without notice.

Any person having a lien under KRS

376.360

to

376.380

against a vessel may unite in an action to enforce the lien, and any person having a lien who is not so united may, by petition filed by leave of court, become a plaintiff in any action pending to enforce a lien without the issuing of additional process.

Any lien given by KRS

376.360

to

376.380

shall not be enforced against a purchaser without actual notice thereof unless action is instituted within one (1) year from the time the cause of action accrued, or unless notice thereof is endorsed on or attached to the enrollment of the vessel.

History.

2485, 2486.